src/skiptir/Pyphen/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_is_2020_alpha.dic
x1a2mi
x1am1í
x1an
xar1
x3a2re
xa1t2
x1á
xár1
x1b
x1d
x1e
x2en
xer1
x1é
x1f
x1g
xg2u
x1h
x1i
xi2l1
xi2s
xist1
x1í1
x2íg
x1k
xl1að
xla1m
xl1an
xl1á2
xl1g
xli1k
xl1í2
x1lj
xl1k
xl1n
x1lo
xl1s
x1m
xmót1
xna1
xn2af2
xn1ey
x1ó
x2ó1l
x1p
x1r
x1s
xt1að
xta1k
xt2are
xt1e
xt3il
x2t1íl
x1tó
x1trak
x1t2ug
x1u
xu2l
xul1e
xu2s
x1ú
xúal1
x1v
x1y
x1ý
x1þ
x1æ
y1af
y1an
y1á
yá2s
y1ba
ybb1a
ybb1l
y1be
y1bi
y1bj
y1br
y1bu
y1d2a
yd1en
y1do
y1dó
ydr1í
y1dö
yð1a
yð2g
yð2i1l
yð2isa
yð2isk
yðj1a
yðl2
yð3li
yð2r
yðri1
yð3rí
yð3ro
yð2s2
yð3sk
yð3so
yð1v4
y1ek
y1es
yf1
y1f2al
yf3ar
yf2á
yf2e
yf2fr
yfi1m
yfi2r
yfi1ske
yfi1t
2yfj
yfj1að
yfj3ar
yf2jö
yf2l
yf3læ
yf2o
yf2r
yfr1i
yf2si
yfs2v
yf2t
yft3un
yft3us
yf3tæ
y2fu
yf2y
yg1en
ygg1a2
ygg3ild
ygg3u
yg3ilf
yg3ilk
ygl1
yg1lag
yg1lo
y1gló.
ygn2i1s
yg1næ
y1go
yg1re
y1grí
yg1rú
yg3uð
y1h
y1i
yja1f4
yja1p
yj3a2r
yjar1k
y1já
yj1ó
yj2ur
yk1á
yk1e
y1k2er
yk1i
ykil1a
yki1lu
yki1p
ykj3a2r1
yk2ko
ykk1var
ykk1vi
yk1lau
y1klá
yk1lit
y1kó
yk1ram
yk1re
y1kró
yk1rö
yk1tó
yk1u
y1k2um
ykur1
y1kú
yk1v
ykv1e
y1k2vö
y1kö
y1lan
y1lau
yld2u1s
yl2dy
ylfa3
ylf3i
yl2g
ylgr1u
y1lí
ylj1ót
ylk1i
yl2l
yll1a
yl3lau
yll1ist
yllí2
yll2s
ylm3a
y1ló
yl1p
ylsk3i
yl1s2v
y1læ
y1lö
ym1an
ym2ann
ym3ari
ym1as
y1mat
ym1br
ymb3u
ym2d
ymd1a
ym1i
ym3ir
ym3is
y1mo
ym2ri
ym2s
ym3skr
y1mun
ym1unu
yn1a
yn1dre
ynd3u
yndu2g
yng1á
yng3is
yngs2
yng1sv
yn1g2y
yn2i1sk
yn2ism
yn2isp
yn2ist
ynj3arv
ynj1ó
ynn1a
ynn2t
yn1o
yn1sá
yn2s1ei
yn1sk
yn1smæ
yn1su
yn1s2vi
yn1tá
ynt1e
y1næ
yp1a
yp1e
yp3er
yp1ill
ypl2
ypp1i
yp2s
ypta1
yp1un
yr1að
yra1f2
yra1g
yra1k
yr1an
yra1p
yrar3m
yra1um
yr1át
yr1e
y1rey
yr3f2l
yr2g
yrg1a
yr3ge
yr3gl
yr3gr
y2r1i
yr3ir
yr3i2s1
yri1t
yr1í
yr2j1
yrk1as
yr2kár.
yrk1el
yrk1l
yrk1rú
yr1kun
yrk1ve
yrk1við
yr2la
yr2m
yr3mo
yr3mý
yrn2a1r2á
yrn1ó
y1ro
yrp1a
yr2re
yr2s2
yr3sá
yr3se
yr3sí
yr3sku
yr3sp
yr3stö
yr3sý
yr3sæ
yrt1a
yrt3il
yr2tr
yrtu1g2
yr1u
y1rud
yru1s
yr2ust
y1rú
ysaf2
ysa1g
ys1and
ysa1r2
ys1as
y1sá
y2s1e
ys1ið
y2sj
ysj1al
ysj1ó
y1ska
y2skar
y1ske
y1sko
ysk1y
y1slá
ys1l2i
ys1m
y2s1p
yss1a
ys2sn
yst1al
y1stá
yst2isv
y1stól
y1strá
y2st1y
ysu1
ys1un
ys1v
y2s1y
yt1að
y1tak
yta1l
yt1e
ytil2
yt3ill
yti1r
yt2i1sle
yt2isp
ytj1á
y1tjú
yt2ka
yt2m
y1to
y1tó
yt2r
ytri1
ytrit2
ytt1a
ytt1ó
ytu1k
y1tæ
yt1ö
y1u
y1v
yv2a
y1w
1yx
y1ý
y1þ
y2þm
y1æ
y1ö
ý1a
ýam1
ý1á
ý1b
1ý2bd
ýbit2
ý1da
ý1dá
ý1de
ý2d1í
ýdr1í
ý1du
ý1dö
ýð1a
ýð2g
ýð3ga
ýð3ge
ýð2ise
ýðs1v
ýðu1r2
ýð2us
ýð1v
ý1e
ýed3i
ýest2
ý1é
ý1fal
ýf2g
ýf1i
ýf3il
ýf2ist
ýf2k
ýfl1ó
ý1flu
ýfn4
ýfni3
ý1fr
ýf2s
1ýg.
ýg3il
ýg1í
ýgj3a
ýg2l
ý1go
ý1gr
ý1h
ý1i
ý1í
ýj1að
ýja1f4
ýja1k
ýja1l
ýj3ar
ý1j4arð
ýj4are
ýj4aro
ýj1as.
ýj1ast
ýj3az
ýj1á
ý1jö
ý1ke
ýk1il
ýk1is
ýk2l
ý1ko
ýk1ó
ý1kr
ý1kú
ý1kv
ý1lau
ý1lá
ýl2f
ýlfr1
ýl2g
ýl1i
ýlis1
ý1lí
ýl1l
ý1lo
ý1ló
ý1ly
ý1lý
ým1a
ý1má
ým1i
ým1í
ý1mj
ým2k1
ýmk3a
ým2r
ým2s
ým1u
ýn3am
ýn1a2s
ýnd1
ýnd3r
ýn1en
ý1no
ýn2s
ýn2u1g
ý1næ
ý1o
ýó1
ý1pe
ýp1i
ýpis1
ýp1ís
ýp2k
ýpk3a
ý1pl
ýp1o
ýp1ót
ýp2s
ýra1f
ýra1g
ýra1k
ýra1l
ýra1m
ýr1an
ýra1rau
ýr2a1re
ýrar3f
ýr1au
ý1rá
ýrð1
ýr1e
ýr2ei
ýr1f2
ýr1gi
ýr1ið
ýr1ik.
ýri1m
ýri1p2
ýr1is
ýr1kj
ýr1kv
ýrl2
ýr3lu
ýr3mu
ýr1ny
ýr1ó
ýrr2i
ýr1rin
ýr2si
ýr1unu
ýru1t
ý1rú
ýrv2
ýr1æt
ýr1ö
ýs1an
ýs1as
ý2sd
ý2si
ýs1ið
ýsi1g4
ýsis3
ý2s1j
ý1ske
ý1skj
ýs2le
ý1sm
ýsn1a
ý1s2o
ý2s1ó
ý2ss
ýsu1
ý1sv
ý1tap
ýt1a2s
ý1te
ý1tilk
ýt3ill
ýt3ils
ýt3ily
ýt3ir
ý1to
ýtr1
ýt2ung
ý1u
ý1ú
ý1v
ý1y
ý1þ
ý2þ3ar
ý1ö
z1að
za1l
z1b
z1d
z1e
z2eb
z1ie
z1il
z1í
zín1
zka1
zk1e
zk1i
zk1í
zl1að
zla1m
zl1an
z1lo
z1m
z1s
z1u
z2ub
z2ug
1þa
þa2k
þak1j
þak1l
þak1r
þak1st
þak1v
þ2al
þal1a
þa2n
þang3a
þan3í
þann3
þ2ar
þar2f
þar2m
þar1t
þa2s
þa2u
þauf3
þám1
þá1mar
þefj1
þefj3a
þef1l
þef1t
þ2ei
þel1p
þe2m
þen2
þeng3
þer2r
þes2
þess1
þey1f
þey1m
þé2l
þf2s
þil1k
þil1p
þil1t
þin2
þing3i
þing1r
þin3i
þin3t
þin3u
þis2
þist3
þ2ía
þjark1
þjó2f
þjó2s
þm3ar
þok1a
þo2l
þol1af
þol1e
þol1f
þol1u
þor1f2
þor1g
þor3m4
þor2s
2þód
þó2f
þóf3ari
þóf1ó
2þ1ó2l
þól2s
þór1e
þór1ó
þra2
þrak1
þr2á
þrá1f
þrá1k
þrá1nau
þrás2
þrá1sin
þrá1st
þre1f
þr2i
þrifa3
þris2
þrisv3
þr2í1
þrík2
þríp2
þrí3s2
þrjót2k3
þru2
þræ2
þ4u
þ2u2l
þul1i
þu2m
þum1a2
þumal1
þung1r
þung3s
þunn1
þ2u2r
þur2f
þur2r
þurr1e
þurr1æ
þu2s
þust1
þú2s
þúst1a
þva2
þvag1
þ2ve
þver1f2
þver3k2
þýf1a
þý1k
þög3u
æ1á
æ1b
æ1da
ædd1a
æ1dí
æ1dj
æ1dr
æ1dú
æ1dö
æð2al
æð3are
æð2g
æð3gö
æð2i1l
æði1str
æðl2
æð3li
æð2s
æð3sk
æð2u1g2
æð2ul
æð2up
æðu1ró
æð2us
æ1e
æf1an
æf3ar
æf1as
æfi1k
æf1ill
æfil2s1
æf1isg
æ1fí
æ1fj
2æfl
æ1frí
æf2t
æfta1
æf1un
æg1a2
æga3g
æ1g2am
æ1gá
ægi1lj
æg2i1sk2
ægis1l
ægi1s2ve
ægj1a
æg1l
ægra3f4
ægr1an
æ1gru
ægs2l
æg2t
æg3us
æ1h
æ1i
æ2ib
æ2il
æi2s1
æj3ar
æj4are
æjar1k
æ1j2ur
æ1jæ
æk1a2
æk2am
æ1ke
æk1ilf
æk3ill
æk1is
ækjar1k
ækjar1ó
ækj1ó
æ1kjö
æk1li
æ1ko
æ1kó
æk3ró
æk2t1
æk1u2
æ1kv
æ1ký
æl1að
æl1an
æland2
æl2a1ra
æ1l2au
æl1en
æ1lé
æl1f
æl1ið
æli1f
æli1k
æli1m
æl2ini
æl1is
æl2iska
ælis1m
æl2isn
æli1t2
æ1lí
æ1lj
æ2lk
æl1lí
æl1lu
æl1mo
æl2n
æl3nag
æl1ó
æl1p
æls2i
æl2sk
æl2s1ó
æl2sv
æl2t
æl1ustu
æ1ly
æ1læ
æm1an
æm3ar
æm4aran
æm1a2st
æ1má
æm2d
æm1ið
æm1is
æmi3s2lí
æm3istö
æm1o
æm2r
æm2s
æm1ugl
æm1unu
æm1us
æ1mú
æ1nap
æn1ás
æn1dj
ænd1s2
æn1er
æn1ey
æng1a
æn1g2ó
æn1gr
æng1sv
æn3ir
æn2isú
æn1j
ænk3a
ænk1i
æn1kí
æn2s
æn3sá
æns2n
ænst3
æn1tó
æn2us
ænut2
æ1ný
æ1o
æp1as
æpl2
æp1li
æp1lu
æp1o
æp1ó
æp2sk
ær1að
ær2af
æra1k2
æra1l
ær1an
ær1a2sta
ær1e
ær2ei
ær2ek
ær1f2
ær3fl
ær1gi
æ2ri
ær1ið
æri1f2
æri1l
æri1p
ær3ir
ær1is
ær3is.
æri1t
ær1k
ærl2
ær3le
ær1ny
æ1ro
ær1ó
ær1p
ær2r
ær3ro
ær3sm
ær1uð
ær1ums
ær1un
ær1ust
æ1rú
æ1rý
ær1æ
æsa1f
æsa1l
æsa3ma
æs1an
æ2si
æs1ið
æs2i1sa
æ1sí
æ2ska
æ1ske
æ1sko
æ1skr
æs2m
æ2sn1
æ1so
æs2r
æst1e
æst2ei
æst3u
æst1æ
æs1un
æ1sv
æta1l
æt1ast
æti1g
æti1l2
æt3irð
ætis1
æti2st
æ1tj
ætl1
ætn1
æt1o
æt1ró
æt1s
æt2sk
ætt3i2s1
ætt1s
ætt2sk
æt2u1g
ætu1k
æ1tú
æ1tö
æ1u
æ1ú
æva1g
æ1vak
æ1val
æv1and
æv3ar
æver2
æ1við
ævi1k
æv1ill
ævi1m
æv1in
æ1vinnu
ævi1s
æ1ví
æ1vo
æv1u
æ1væ
æ1vö
æxn1
æ1þ
æ1ö
ö1a
öar2
öarm1
ö1á
ö1bu
ödd1
öð2k
öð2l
öð2m
öð3mó
öðm1u
öð2r
öðr1i
öðr1ó
öð2u1s
öð2v
öðv1an
öð3ve
öðv1i
öðv1í
öe1
2öf.
ö1fa
öf2f
öf2g
öfl1ó
2öfn
öf1rí
öfr1u
öft3u
ö2f1u
öf3uð
öful1æ
ö2f1y
ög1a
ög3ar
ög1d
ö2g1e
ög1gi
ög1gj
ög1gri
öggs2i
ögg1st
ögg4v1ið
ö2g1j
ög1læ
ögn1ó
ög1r
ög2ra
ögr1an
ög2r3i
ög1s2
ög3ti
ög2t1r
ö2gu
ög3uð
ögu1s
ögv4
ö2g1æ
ö2g1ö
ö1h
öj1
ö2k1e
ök2k
ökk3j4
2ökku
ökkv3ar
ök2l
ök3lau
ök3le
ökl3i
ö2ko1
ökra1
ök1rá
ök1ræ
ök1s
ök2t1
ök1ulb
ökul1d
ök1uls
ök1ulv
ök2u1p2
ök2u1ri
ökv3ar.
ök1ve
ök1vil
ök1ví
ök1vo
öl1a
öl1á
öld2ar
öl1dre
öld2ug
ö2l1e
öl1é
öl1fa
öl1fl
öl1gir
öl1gj
öl1i
öl1j
öl1k2a
öl1ká
öl1ki
öl1kj
öl1kú
öl1lan
öll1d
öl1lis
öl1lj
öl1m
ölm3u
öl1o
öl1ó
öl3ót
öl1pr
öl1sal
öl1sá
öl1si
öls2k
öl1s2l
öl1sn
öl1s2o
öl1svi
2ölt
öl1tak
ölt1o
öl2tr
ölt3s
öl1t2unn
öl1ugu
öl3und
ölu1t2
öl2va
ölv3ara
ölv3ari
öl2vis
öl1æ
ö1má
öm2b
öm2m
ömm1e
ömm1ó
ö2m1ó
ömp1
öm2r1
öms1
öm1u
ömu1g
ön1da
önd2l
öndl1a
ön2g
öngl4and
öng2lið
öng2l3in
öng1læ
öng2v
öngv1in
ön3ik
ön1í
öník2
ön1ó
ön2s
ö1o
öpl1
öpp1
öp1u
ör1að
ör1an
ör1a2sk
ör1au
ör1á
ör1e
ör1fis
ör1g2a
örgl3
ör2g1ó
örg2s1
ör1i
ör1í2
ör1k2a
örkam1
örkamb4
ör1k2is
ör1kj
ör1kl
ör2lin
örm1un
ör1nið
ör1ní
örn1ó
ör1o
ör1ó
ör1pa
ör1pi
örp1un
örr1an
örs3ið
ör3sj
örsn2
ör3s2u
ör3sæ
ör1ta2
ör2tó
ör1t2v
ör1uð
ör1ugl
ör1ull
öru1m
ör1un
ör2up
öru1s
öru1t
ör1ú
ör2v1að
örv1all
ör2v1and
ör2v3ar
1ör1y
ör1æ
ö1r2æð
öskr3
ösk2u1p2
ösk2v
öskv1i
ösl1a
ö1so
ö2s1ó
ö2sp
ös2s1
2öst
öst2ir
öst1ó
2ös1u
ös2v1
ösv3a
öt1á
ö1tig
öt3mu
öt1ó
ö2tr
öt1ré
öt1sá
öt3s2e
öts1m
öt2s1tu
öt2s1æ
ött1
öt1t2r
öt3ul
öt2u1ra
öt1ú
öt2v1a
öt1æ
öt1ö
ö1u
ö1vi
öxa2
öx3ar
1öxi
1öxl
öx2n
öx3ul
öy1
ö1þ
ül2l1
